District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.04

Interjurisdictional and intrajurisdictional privileges.

(a)

The District of Columbia as a member jurisdiction will provide reciprocity to fleet vehicles that are engaged in interjurisdictional movement and intrajurisdictional movement, and are properly registered with another member jurisdiction.

(b)

All apportioned operators of fleet vehicles are required to have available for inspection an IVMR and must identify the mileage accumulated within the District of Columbia within one mile. Inspections of the IVMR may occur in combination with the performance of law enforcement duties related to violations of a municipal traffic code, conducting road-side vehicle inspections, and investigating vehicles not properly registered.

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 5, 44 DCR 3620
1981 Ed., § 40-124.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1507.01.